apertium-sv-da/dev/comb.da.dix
    <pardef n="portræt__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tet</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ter</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>terne</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="f/ar__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aren</l>
          <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ædre</l>
          <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ædrene</l>
          <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mad__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="program__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>met</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mer</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>merne</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Verbs -->

    <pardef n="/være__vbser">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>vær</l>
          <r>være<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>være</l>
          <r>være<s n="vbser"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>være<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>var</l>
          <r>være<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>været</l>
          <r>være<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ha/ve__vbhaver">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>v</l>
          <r>ve<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ve</l>
          <r>ve<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>r</l>
          <r>ve<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>vde</l>
          <r>ve<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ft</l>
          <r>ve<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="tal/e__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>te</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mal/e__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ede</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="s/e__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>å</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="bl/ive__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iv</l>
          <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ive</l>
          <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iver</l>
          <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ev</l>
          <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>evet</l>
          <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="k/unne__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>unne</l>
          <r>unne<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>an</l>
          <r>unne<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>unne</l>
          <r>unne<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>unnet</l>
          <r>unne<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="sk/ulle__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ulle</l>
          <r>ulle<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>al</l>
          <r>ulle<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ulle</l>
          <r>ulle<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ullet</l>
          <r>ulle<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="vil/le__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>le</l>
          <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>le</l>
          <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>let</l>
          <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="må/tte__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tte</l>
          <r>tte<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>tte<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tte</l>
          <r>tte<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ttet</l>
          <r>tte<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="korset"><i>korset</i><par n="portræt__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mad"><i>mad</i><par n="mad__n"/></e>
    <e lm="portræt"><i>portræt</i><par n="portræt__n"/></e>
    <e lm="program"><i>program</i><par n="program__n"/></e>
    <e lm="far"><i>f</i><par n="f/ar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="være"><i></i><par n="/være__vbser"/></e>
    <e lm="have"><i>ha</i><par n="ha/ve__vbhaver"/></e>
    <e lm="købe"><i>køb</i><par n="tal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="skrive"><i>skr</i><par n="bl/ive__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="beskrive"><i>beskr</i><par n="bl/ive__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="afblæse"><i>afblæs</i><par n="tal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="afgnave"><i>afgnav</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="aflæse"><i>aflæs</i><par n="tal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="afpudse"><i>afpuds</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="afskrive"><i>afskr</i><par n="bl/ive__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="aftjene"><i>aftjen</i><par n="tal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="aktualisere"><i>aktualiser</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="anse"><i>ans</i><par n="s/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="autorisere"><i>autoriser</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="behænge"><i>behæng</i><par n="tal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bemægtige"><i>bemægtig</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bevogte"><i>bevogt</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bilde"><i>bild</i><par n="tal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bugne"><i>bugn</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dirigere"><i>diriger</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="eftersende"><i>eftersend</i><par n="tal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="efterskrive"><i>efterskr</i><par n="bl/ive__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="forevige"><i>forevig</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="forlede"><i>forled</i><par n="tal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="forudse"><i>foruds</i><par n="s/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="gengælde"><i>gengæld</i><par n="tal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="halshugge"><i>halshugg</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="henvende"><i>henvend</i><par n="tal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="imødese"><i>imødes</i><par n="s/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="indkøre"><i>indkør</i><par n="tal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kalke"><i>kalk</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="linjere"><i>linjer</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="misunde"><i>misund</i><par n="tal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="nedskrive"><i>nedskr</i><par n="bl/ive__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="omskrive"><i>omskr</i><par n="bl/ive__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="passere"><i>passer</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="påtale"><i>påtal</i><par n="tal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="slikke"><i>slikk</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tilstræbe"><i>tilstræb</i><par n="tal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="udringe"><i>udring</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="udskrive"><i>udskr</i><par n="bl/ive__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="udvise"><i>udvis</i><par n="tal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="blive"><i>bl</i><par n="bl/ive__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="brænde"><i>brænd</i><par n="tal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="duplikere"><i>dupliker</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="genanvende"><i>genanvend</i><par n="tal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="granske"><i>gransk</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kunne"><i>k</i><par n="k/unne__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="læse"><i>læs</i><par n="tal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="medfinansiere"><i>medfinansier</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="måtte"><i>må</i><par n="må/tte__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="overhøre"><i>overhør</i><par n="tal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="påtage"><i>påtag</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="se"><i>s</i><par n="s/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sige"><i>sig</i><par n="tal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="skulle"><i>sk</i><par n="sk/ulle__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sulte"><i>sult</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tilhøre"><i>tilhør</i><par n="tal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="underkende"><i>underkend</i><par n="tal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ville"><i>vil</i><par n="vil/le__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ødsle"><i>ødsl</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
